Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-8] Protective custody by police
officer without court order. (a) A police officer shall assume protective
custody of a child without a court order and without the consent of the child's
family, if in the discretion of the police officer, the officer determines that:

(1) The child is subject to imminent harm while in
the custody of the child's family;

(2) The child has no parent, as defined in this
chapter, who is willing and able to provide a safe family home for the child;

(3) The child has no caregiver, as defined in this
chapter, who is willing and able to provide a safe and appropriate placement
for the child; or

(4) The child's parent has subjected the child to
harm or threatened harm and the parent is likely to flee with the child.

(b) The department shall assume temporary
foster custody of the child when a police officer has completed the transfer of
protective custody of the child to the department as follows:

(1) A police officer who assumes protective custody
of a child shall complete transfer of protective custody to the department by
presenting physical custody of the child to the department; or

(2) If the child is or will be admitted to a hospital
or similar institution, the police officer shall immediately complete the
transfer of protective custody to the department by notifying the department
and receiving an acknowledgment from the hospital or similar institution that
it has been informed that the child is under the temporary foster custody of
the department. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Prior law.

Consent for Testing and Treatment of Minors in Hawaii. 13
HBJ, no. 13, at 165 (2009).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next